Hawaii statutes.
[§414-20] Penalty for signing false
document. (a) A person commits an offense if the person signs a document
the person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document
be delivered to the department director for filing.

(b) An offense under this section is a class C
felony. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next